Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 8

General Provisions

16-15-801. General sessions courts empowered to issue execution.

The general sessions court that renders a judgment may issue execution on the judgment.

Code 1858, § 3070 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 17, §§ 14, 16); Shan., § 4797; Code 1932, § 8928; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-601; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 53; T.C.A., § 19-3-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 32.

Law Reviews.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

Judicial Reform at the Lowest Level: A Model Statute for Small Claims Courts, Part II, 28 Vand. L. Rev. 730.

Collateral References. Execution
60.

16-15-802. Compromise after appeal.

Where an appeal has been prayed and obtained from a judgment of a general sessions court, if the plaintiff and defendant compromise the case before the papers have been returned to the court to which the appeal was taken, and file with the general sessions court a written notice of the fact, signed by both parties, the general sessions court shall issue execution on the judgment, as if no appeal had been taken.

Code 1858, § 3072 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 33, § 5); Shan., § 4799; Code 1932, § 8930; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-603; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 53; T.C.A., § 19-3-102.

16-15-803. Issuance after destruction of records.

When the docket book and original papers belonging to the general sessions court are destroyed, and the judge makes oath to that effect, it shall be lawful for the judge, or the judge's successor in office, upon the plaintiff, the plaintiff's agent, attorney, or returning officer filing with the judge an affidavit setting forth the name of the plaintiff or plaintiffs, defendant or defendants, the date and amount of judgment as near as may be, and that the judgment has not been paid, to issue execution as though the original papers and docket book had not been destroyed; and it shall be as good and valid, and have the same force and effect, as other executions issued by general sessions courts.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 54, § 1; Shan., § 4800; Code 1932, § 8931; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-604; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 53; T.C.A., § 19-3-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 32; 18 Tenn. Juris., Lost Instruments and Records, §§ 13, 14.

Cited: Fleming v. Kemp, 27 Tenn. App. 150, 178 S.W.2d 397, 1943 Tenn. App. LEXIS 137 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1943).

16-15-804. Execution on real property.

Whenever any execution issued by a general sessions court is levied on real estate, and ten (10) days from date of the levy has expired, the title to real estate shall not be affected as to third parties until the execution or the papers in the cause are filed in the circuit court of the county in which the land lies.

The officer making the levy shall, within ten (10) days thereafter, return the execution to the circuit court, where the cause will be at once docketed, and the officer will return the fact of the return of the execution to the circuit court to the general sessions court issuing the execution, whereupon the general sessions court shall file the remaining papers in the cause in the circuit court as required by subdivision (c)(1).

When an execution issued by a general sessions court is levied on real estate, it shall be the duty of the general sessions court to whom the execution is returned to send the execution, together with the judgment and the papers in the cause, to the next circuit court of the general sessions court's county for condemnation.

The circuit court, upon the return made pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), may condemn the land, and order the land, or so much of the land as it may see proper, to be sold by the sheriff of the county in satisfaction of the judgment and costs.

If the circuit court condemns the land to be sold, the clerk shall enter on the minutes the warrant, attachment or other leading process, with the officer's return on the warrant, attachment or other leading process, the prosecution and other bonds where the condition has not been discharged, affidavits for attachment or other process, the judgment of the general sessions court, the execution levied with the officer's return and the judgment of the court.

When several executions in favor of the same plaintiff are returned at the same term of the court, levied on the same tract of land, they shall all be included in one (1) judgment of condemnation, and only one (1) order of sale shall issue.

The clerk of the circuit court may issue execution for the unsatisfied debt and costs, in all cases where a general sessions court's execution has been levied on land, and return made of the execution to the general sessions court, according to law, and the real estate executed fails, for any cause, to satisfy the judgment.

Executions under subdivision (f)(1) may be issued to any county from which the plaintiff shall receive the same benefit, and the officer into whose hands it may come shall have the same authority to proceed as if the execution had issued from a general sessions court on a judgment rendered by it in the county to which the execution is directed.

Code 1858, §§ 3076, 3077, 3080-3083 (deriv. Acts 1786, ch. 14, § 10; Acts 1825, ch. 23, § 1; Acts 1825, ch. 66, § 1; Acts 1829, ch. 12, § 1; Acts 1835-1836, ch. 17, § 11; Acts 1839-1840, ch. 161, § 1); Acts 1899, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 4804, 4805, 4808-4811; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8935, 8936, 8939-8945; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 19-605 — 19-612; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 53; T.C.A., § 19-3-104.

Compiler's Notes. References in some of the annotations for this section to “justices of the peace” are deemed references to “courts of general sessions” or “judges of courts of general sessions.” See Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, §§ 31, 98, 110; 10 Tenn. Juris., Ejectment, § 9; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 26, 32-36.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

16-15-805. Execution on personal property.

The officer levying an execution issued by a general sessions court on personalty shall advertise the sale of the personalty for ten (10) days at one (1) public place in the district in which the defendant resides, at the courthouse door of the county and at two (2) public places in the district where the sale is made, subject to § 26-5-101.

Where there is not sufficient time between the levy and return day of an execution from a general sessions court's judgment to sell, or where, for any reason, the sale cannot be had before the return, the lien given by the levy shall continue, and the general sessions court, or other proper officer, shall issue an order of sale on the execution levied and returned.

Code 1858, §§ 3079, 3084 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 90, § 1; Acts 1835-1836, ch. 17, § 4); Shan., §§ 4807, 4812; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8938, 8945; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 19-613, 19-614; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 53; T.C.A., § 19-3-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 32.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

16-15-806. Executions enforceable in all counties.

Except with regard to executions on real property that are governed by §§ 16-15-804 and 16-15-805, after the time for filing appeal has expired, the procedure for executions and proceedings supplementary to and in aid of judgments of courts of general sessions, including, but not limited to, garnishments, shall be enforceable in every county in this state in the same manner as a judgment of a court of record.

Code 1858, §§ 3073-3075 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 66, §§ 4, 6; Acts 1851-1852, ch. 181, § 3); Shan., §§ 4801-4803; Code 1932, §§ 8932-8934; Acts 1970, ch. 453, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 19-615 — 19-617; Acts 1989, ch. 404, § 4; 1993, ch. 241, § 53; T.C.A., § 19-3-106.

Compiler's Notes. References in some of the annotations for this section to “justices of the peace” are deemed references to “courts of general sessions” or “judges of courts of general sessions.” See Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 173; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 32.

Law Reviews.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

Cited: Sullivan v. Eason, 8 Tenn. App. 429, — S.W.2d —, 1928 Tenn. App. LEXIS 156 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1928); Erwin Nat'l Bank v. Riddle, 18 Tenn. App. 561, 79 S.W.2d 1032, 1934 Tenn. App. LEXIS 58 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1934); Saunders v. Moore, 21 Tenn. App. 375, 110 S.W.2d 1046, 1937 Tenn. App. LEXIS 40 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1937).

16-15-807. Priority of time.

When an execution issued from the judgment of a court of record, and an execution from a general sessions court's judgment, are levied on the same personal property, the execution first levied shall have preference.

Code 1858, § 3078 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 72); Shan., § 4806; Code 1932, § 8937; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-618; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 53; T.C.A., § 19-3-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 68.